District of Columbia statutes.
11-1572

Regulations; effect on Reform Act.

(a)

The Secretary is authorized to issue regulations to implement, interpret, administer, and carry out the purposes of this subchapter, and, in the Secretary’s discretion, those regulations may have retroactive effect, except that nothing in this subsection may be construed to permit the Secretary to issue any regulation to retroactively reduce or eliminate the benefits to which any individual is entitled under this subchapter.

(b)

This subchapter supersedes any provision of the District of Columbia Retirement Reform Act (Public Law 96-122) inconsistent with this subchapter and the regulations thereunder.

History

Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2420, Pub. L. 105-274, § 2(b)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-535, Pub. L. 105-277, § 804(b)

Cross References

Register of wills, deputies and other employees, see § 11-2105.
Superior Court, administration by chief judge, discharge of duties, see § 11-906.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1572.